South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4395.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1140 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (15) income received by a student athlete at an institution of higher learning as compensation for the use of his name, image, or likeness, to the extent such income is included in the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income and is not otherwise exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to income tax years beginning after 2024. ----XX----